Illinois, session 104th, SB2241.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 7-61, 10-3, and 17-16.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/7-61)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-61)7    Sec. 7-61. Whenever a special election is necessary, the 8provisions of this Article are applicable to the nomination of 9candidates to be voted for at such special election.10    In cases where a primary election is required, the officer 11or board or commission whose duty it is under the provisions of 12this Code relating to general elections to call an election 13shall fix a date for the primary for the nomination of 14candidates to be voted for at such special election. Notice of 15such primary shall be given at least 15 days prior to the 16maximum time provided for the filing of petitions for such a 17primary as provided in Section 7-12.18    Any vacancy in nomination under the provisions of this 19Article 7 occurring on or after the primary and prior to 20certification of candidates by the certifying board or officer 21must be filled prior to the date of certification. Any vacancy 22in nomination occurring after certification but prior to 15 23days before the general election shall be filled within 8 days   SB2241- 2 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1after the event creating the vacancy. The resolution filling 2the vacancy shall be sent by U. S. mail or personal delivery to 3the certifying officer or board within 3 days of the action by 4which the vacancy was filled; provided, if such resolution is 5sent by mail and the U. S. postmark on the envelope containing 6such resolution is dated prior to the expiration of such 3-day 7limit, the resolution shall be deemed filed within such 3-day 8limit. Failure to so transmit the resolution within the time 9specified in this Section shall authorize the certifying 10officer or board to certify the original candidate. Vacancies 11shall be filled by the officers of a local municipal or 12township political party as specified in subsection (h) of 13Section 7-8, other than a statewide political party, that is 14established only within a municipality or township and the 15managing committee (or legislative committee in case of a 16candidate for State Senator or representative committee in the 17case of a candidate for State Representative in the General 18Assembly or State central committee in the case of a candidate 19for statewide office, including, but not limited to, the 20office of United States Senator) of the respective political 21party for the territorial area in which such vacancy occurs.22    The resolution to fill a vacancy in nomination shall be 23duly acknowledged before an officer qualified to take 24acknowledgments of deeds and shall include, upon its face, the 25following information:26        (a) the name of the original nominee and the office   SB2241- 3 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1    vacated;2        (b) the date on which the vacancy occurred;3        (c) the name and address of the nominee selected to 4    fill the vacancy and the date of selection.5    The resolution to fill a vacancy in nomination shall be 6accompanied by a Statement of Candidacy, as prescribed in 7Section 7-10, completed by the selected nominee and a receipt 8indicating that such nominee has filed a statement of economic 9interests as required by the Illinois Governmental Ethics Act.10    The provisions of Section 10-8 through 10-10.1 relating to 11objections to certificates of nomination and nomination 12papers, hearings on objections, and judicial review, shall 13apply to and govern objections to resolutions for filling a 14vacancy in nomination.15    Any vacancy in nomination occurring 15 days or less before 16the consolidated election or the general election shall not be 17filled. In this event, the certification of the original 18candidate shall stand and his name shall appear on the 19official ballot to be voted at the general election.20    A vacancy in nomination occurs when a candidate who has 21been nominated under the provisions of this Article 7 dies 22before the election (whether death occurs prior to, on or 23after the day of the primary), or declines the nomination; 24provided that nominations may become vacant for other reasons.25    If the name of no established political party candidate 26was printed on the consolidated primary ballot for a   SB2241- 4 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1particular office and if no person was nominated as a write-in 2candidate for such office, a vacancy in nomination shall be 3created which may be filled in accordance with the 4requirements of this Section. Except as otherwise provided in 5this Code, if the name of no established political party 6candidate was printed on the general primary ballot for an 7office nominated under this Article and if no person was 8nominated as a write-in candidate for such office, a vacancy 9in nomination shall be filled only by a person designated by 10the appropriate committee of the political party and only if 11that designated person files nominating petitions with the 12number of signatures required for an established party 13candidate for that office within 75 days after the day of the 14general primary. The circulation period for those petitions 15begins on the day the appropriate committee designates that 16person. The person shall file his or her nominating petitions, 17statements of candidacy, notice of appointment by the 18appropriate committee, and receipt of filing his or her 19statement of economic interests together. These documents 20shall be filed at the same location as provided in Section 217-12. The electoral boards having jurisdiction under Section 2210-9 to hear and pass upon objections to nominating petitions 23also shall hear and pass upon objections to nomination 24petitions filed by candidates under this paragraph.25    A candidate for whom a nomination paper has been filed as a 26partisan candidate at a primary election, and who is defeated   SB2241- 5 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1for his or her nomination at such primary election, is 2ineligible to be listed on the ballot at that general or 3consolidated election as a candidate of another political 4party.5    A candidate seeking election to an office for which 6candidates of political parties are nominated by caucus who is 7a participant in the caucus and who is defeated for his or her 8nomination at such caucus is ineligible to be listed on the 9ballot at that general or consolidated election as a candidate 10of another political party.11    A candidate seeking election to an office for which 12candidates of political parties are nominated by caucus who is 13a participant in the caucus and who has signed a petition of 14another established political party, a new political party, or 15an independent candidate is ineligible to be listed on the 16ballot at that general or consolidated election as a candidate 17of the political party holding the caucus.18    In the proceedings to nominate a candidate to fill a 19vacancy or to fill a vacancy in the nomination, each precinct, 20township, ward, county, or congressional district, as the case 21may be, shall, through its representative on such central or 22managing committee, be entitled to one vote for each ballot 23voted in such precinct, township, ward, county, or 24congressional district, as the case may be, by the primary 25electors of its party at the primary election immediately 26preceding the meeting at which such vacancy is to be filled.  SB2241- 6 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1    For purposes of this Section, the words "certify" and 2"certification" shall refer to the act of officially declaring 3the names of candidates entitled to be printed upon the 4official ballot at an election and directing election 5authorities to place the names of such candidates upon the 6official ballot. "Certifying officers or board" shall refer to 7the local election official, the election authority, or the 8State Board of Elections, as the case may be, with whom 9nomination papers, including certificates of nomination and 10resolutions to fill vacancies in nomination, are filed and 11whose duty it is to certify candidates.12(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 13103-586, eff. 5-3-24.) 14    (10 ILCS 5/10-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-3)15    Sec. 10-3. Nomination of independent candidates (not 16candidates of any political party), for any office to be 17filled by the voters of the State at large may also be made by 18nomination papers signed in the aggregate for each candidate 19by 1% of the number of voters who voted in the next preceding 20Statewide general election or 25,000 qualified voters of the 21State, whichever is less. Nominations of independent 22candidates for public office within any district or political 23subdivision less than the State, may be made by nomination 24papers signed in the aggregate for each candidate by qualified 25voters of such district, or political subdivision, equaling   SB2241- 7 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1not less than 5%, nor more than 8% (or 50 more than the 2minimum, whichever is greater) of the number of persons, who 3voted at the next preceding regular election in such district 4or political subdivision in which such district or political 5subdivision voted as a unit for the election of officers to 6serve its respective territorial area. However, whenever the 7minimum signature requirement for an independent candidate 8petition for a district or political subdivision office shall 9exceed the minimum number of signatures for an independent 10candidate petition for an office to be filled by the voters of 11the State at large at the next preceding State-wide general 12election, such State-wide petition signature requirement shall 13be the minimum for an independent candidate petition for such 14district or political subdivision office. For the first 15election following a redistricting of congressional districts, 16nomination papers for an independent candidate for 17congressperson shall be signed by at least 5,000 qualified 18voters of the congressional district. For the first election 19following a redistricting of legislative districts, nomination 20papers for an independent candidate for State Senator in the 21General Assembly shall be signed by at least 3,000 qualified 22voters of the legislative district. For the first election 23following a redistricting of representative districts, 24nomination papers for an independent candidate for State 25Representative in the General Assembly shall be signed by at 26least 1,500 qualified voters of the representative district.   SB2241- 8 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1For the first election following redistricting of county board 2districts, or of municipal wards or districts, or for the 3first election following the initial establishment of such 4districts or wards in a county or municipality, nomination 5papers for an independent candidate for county board member, 6or for alderperson or trustee of such municipality, shall be 7signed by qualified voters of the district or ward equal to not 8less than 5% nor more than 8% (or 50 more than the minimum, 9whichever is greater) of the total number of votes cast at the 10preceding general or general municipal election, as the case 11may be, for the county or municipal office voted on throughout 12such county or municipality for which the greatest total 13number of votes were cast for all candidates, divided by the 14number of districts or wards, but in any event not less than 25 15qualified voters of the district or ward. Each voter signing a 16nomination paper shall add to his signature his place of 17residence, and each voter may subscribe to one nomination for 18such office to be filled, and no more: Provided that the name 19of any candidate whose name may appear in any other place upon 20the ballot shall not be so added by petition for the same 21office.22    The person circulating the petition, or the candidate on 23whose behalf the petition is circulated, may strike any 24signature from the petition, provided that; 25        (1) the person striking the signature shall initial 26    the petition at the place where the signature is struck;   SB2241- 9 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1    and 2        (2) the person striking the signature shall sign a 3    certification listing the page number and line number of 4    each signature struck from the petition. Such 5    certification shall be filed as a part of the petition. 6        (3) the persons striking signatures from the petition 7    shall each sign an additional certificate specifying the 8    number of certification pages listing stricken signatures 9    which are attached to the petition and the page numbers 10    indicated on such certifications. The certificate shall be 11    filed as a part of the petition, shall be numbered, and 12    shall be attached immediately following the last page of 13    voters' signatures and before the certifications of 14    stricken signatures. 15        (4) all of the foregoing requirements shall be 16    necessary to effect a valid striking of any signature. The 17    provisions of this Section authorizing the striking of 18    signatures shall not impose any criminal liability on any 19    person so authorized for signatures which may be 20    fraudulent.21    In the case of the offices of Governor and Lieutenant 22Governor a joint petition including one candidate for each of 23those offices must be filed.24    A candidate for whom a nomination paper has been filed as a 25partisan candidate at a primary election, and who is defeated 26for his or her nomination at the primary election, is   SB2241- 10 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1ineligible to be placed on the ballot as an independent 2candidate for election in that general or consolidated 3election.4    A candidate seeking election to an office for which 5candidates of political parties are nominated by caucus who is 6a participant in the caucus and who is defeated for his or her 7nomination at such caucus, is ineligible to be listed on the 8ballot at that general or consolidated election as an 9independent candidate.10    A candidate seeking election to an office as an 11independent candidate is ineligible to be listed on the ballot 12at the general or consolidated election if the candidate has 13signed a petition of an established political party or a new 14political party for another office during the same election.15(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/17-16.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 17-16.1)17    Sec. 17-16.1. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, 18write-in votes shall be counted only for persons who have 19filed notarized declarations of intent to be write-in 20candidates with the proper election authority or authorities 21not later than 61 days prior to the election. However, 22whenever an objection to a candidate's nominating papers or 23petitions for any office is sustained under Section 10-10 24after the 61st day before the election, then write-in votes 25shall be counted for that candidate if he or she has filed a   SB2241- 11 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1notarized declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for 2that office with the proper election authority or authorities 3not later than 7 days prior to the election. 4    Forms for the declaration of intent to be a write-in 5candidate shall be supplied by the election authorities. Such 6declaration shall specify the office for which the person 7seeks election as a write-in candidate.8    The election authority or authorities shall deliver a list 9of all persons who have filed such declarations to the 10election judges in the appropriate precincts prior to the 11election.12    A candidate for whom a nomination paper has been filed as a 13partisan candidate at a primary election, and who is defeated 14for his or her nomination at the primary election is 15ineligible to file a declaration of intent to be a write-in 16candidate for election in that general or consolidated 17election.18    A candidate seeking election to an office for which 19candidates of political parties are nominated by caucus who is 20a participant in the caucus and who is defeated for his or her 21nomination at such caucus is ineligible to file a declaration 22of intent to be a write-in candidate for election in that 23general or consolidated election.24    A candidate seeking election to an office for which 25candidates are nominated at a primary election on a 26nonpartisan basis and who is defeated for his or her   SB2241- 12 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1nomination at the primary election is ineligible to file a 2declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for election 3in that general or consolidated election.4    A candidate seeking election to an office for which 5candidates are nominated at a primary election on a 6nonpartisan basis and who has signed a petition of an 7established political party or a new political party during 8the same primary election is ineligible to file a declaration 9of intent to be a write-in candidate for election in that 10general or consolidated election.11    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to apply to 12votes cast under the provisions of subsection (b) of Section 1316-5.01.14(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 15    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by changing 16Section 45-50 as follows: 17    (60 ILCS 1/45-50)18    Sec. 45-50. Caucus procedures. 19    (a) The rules of procedure for conducting a township or 20multi-township caucus must be approved and may be amended by a 21majority vote of the qualified participants attending the 22caucus. No participant shall be able to participate or vote at 23any township or multi-township caucus if the person is or was 24at anytime during the 12 months before the caucus any of the   SB2241- 13 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1following:2        (1) An elected or appointed public official of another 3    established political party.4        (2) An elected or appointed officer, director, 5    precinct committeeman or representative of the township 6    committeeman of another established political party.7        (3) A judge of election under Article 13 or 14 of the 8    Election Code for another statewide established political 9    party.10        (4) A voter who voted in the primary election of 11    another statewide established political party different 12    from the party holding the caucus.13        (5) A person who signed a petition for a candidate of 14    another established political party, a new political 15    party, or an independent candidate. 16    (b) The rules of procedure shall include the following:17        (1) No caucus shall commence earlier than 6:00 p.m.18        (2) The caucus shall commence at the place specified 19    in the notice of caucus.20        (3) Procedures by which qualified caucus participants 21    determine by a majority vote the duties of caucus judges 22    of election. Caucus judges of election shall be appointed 23    by a majority vote of the township or multi-township 24    central committee. No judge of the Supreme Court, 25    appellate court, or circuit court or associate judge shall 26    serve as a caucus judge of election.  SB2241- 14 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1        (4) Nominations for selection as a candidate shall be 2    accepted from any qualified participant of the caucus.3        (5) The method of voting (i.e., written ballot, voice 4    vote, show of hands, standing vote) for determining the 5    candidate or candidates selected for nomination.6        (6) Whether candidates will be selected as a slate or 7    as individual nominees for each office.8        (7) Whether written notice of intent to be a caucus 9    nominee is required.10        (8) Other rules deemed necessary by the central 11    committee at the time the rules are promulgated or by the 12    majority of the qualified caucus participants when the 13    rules are being considered at their meeting.14        (9) A participant in a caucus shall be entitled to 15    only one vote for each office for which he or she is 16    voting. A participant's vote shall not be weighted to be 17    equal to more than one vote. 18    (c) Individuals participating at an established political 19party township or multi-township caucus shall comply with each 20of the following:21        (1) A participant shall be registered under Article 4, 22    5, or 6 of the Election Code.23        (2) A participant shall be registered within the 24    territory for which the nomination is made.25        (3) A participant shall sign an affidavit that he or 26    she is a registered voter and affiliated with the   SB2241- 15 -LRB104 09173 SPS 19229 b1    established political party holding the caucus.2        (4) A participant shall not take part in the 3    proceedings of more than one established political party 4    township and multi-township caucus for the same election. 5    This requirement also applies to the township and 6    multi-township clerks.7        (5) A participant shall not sign a petition of 8    nomination for an independent or new political party 9    candidate for the same election.10        (6) A participant shall not become an independent 11    candidate or a candidate of another established political 12    party or a new political party for the same election.13    (d) The voters participating at an established political 14party township or multi-township caucus shall not select for 15nomination more candidates than there are to be elected for 16each office.17    (e) No candidate for nomination at a township or 18multi-township caucus shall be required to do either of the 19following:20        (1) Circulate and file nominating petitions to become 21    a candidate at the caucus.22        (2) File a fee to become a candidate at the caucus.23(Source: P.A. 100-219, eff. 8-18-17.)